West Virginia, session 2025, HB2630.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Chapter 7. county commissions and officers. ARTICLE 1. County commissions generally. §7-1-17. Mandatory drug testing of all classes of employees. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, beginning on July 1, 2025, all classes of personnel hired for employment by county commissions are subject to random drug testing in the manner prescribed in §21-3E-1 et seq.(b) Each county commission shall adopt rules to implement this section. The rules shall include: (1) That after being offered employment, the employee shall pass a drug test before beginning employment; and (2) ten percent of all employees are subject to random drug testing each year. CHAPTER 18. EDUCATION. ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-46. Mandatory drug testing of all classes of employees. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, beginning with the school year 2025-2026, all classes of personnel and teachers hired for employment with the State Board of Education are subject to random drug testing in the manner prescribed in §21-3E-1 et seq.(b) The State Board of Education shall propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. to implement this section. The rules shall include: (1) That after being offered employment, the employee shall pass a drug test before beginning employment; and (2) ten percent of all employees and volunteers (such as volunteer coaches) are subject to random drug testing each year. ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-52. Mandatory drug testing of all classes of employees. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, beginning with the school year 2025-2026, all classes of personnel and teachers hired for employment in K through 12 are subject to random drug testing in the manner prescribed in §21-3E-1 et seq.(b) The State Board of Education shall propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. to implement this section. The rules shall include: (1) That after being offered employment, the employee shall pass a drug test before beginning employment; and (2) ten percent of all employees and volunteers (such as volunteer coaches) are subject to random drug testing each year. CHAPTER 29. MISCELLANEOUS BOARDS AND OFFICERS. ARTICLE 6. CIVIL SERVICE SYSTEM. §29-6-29. Mandatory drug testing of all classes of employees. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, beginning on July 1, 2025, all classes of personnel hired for employment with the state of West Virginia are subject to random drug testing in the manner prescribed in §21-3E-1 et seq.(b) The Director of Personnel shall propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. to implement this section. The rules shall include: (1) That after being offered employment, the employee shall pass a drug test before beginning employment; and (2) ten percent of all employees are subject to random drug testing each year.